sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Ťažké strojárenstvo > Skrejpre: Zdvíhacie skrejpre; Skrejpre s otvorenou lyžicou; Ťahacie skrejpre
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Тяжелая техника > Скреперы: Скреперы с элеваторной загрузкой; Скреперы с открытым ковшом; Прицепные скреперы
da: Erhverv og industri > Store maskiner > Skrabere: Hæveskrabere; Åbne skrabere; Trækskrabere
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Raskaskalusto > Tiehöylät: Nostotiehöylät; Avoimet tiehöylät; Vetotiehöylät
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 重機 > スクレーパ: エレベーティングスクレーパ; オープンボールスクレーパ; プル工法スクレーパ
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Težka mehanizacija > Strgalci: Dvignjeni strgalci; Strgalci z odprto posodo; Vlečni strgalci
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Βαρέα μηχανήματα > Μηχανήματα απόξεσης/ξέστρες: Ανυψωτικές ξέστρες; Ξέστρες με ανοιχτό κάδο; Μηχανήματα απόξεσης/ξέστρες έλξης
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Schwermaschinen > Schürfzüge: Hebende Schürfzüge; Schürfzüge mit offenem Schürfkübel; Gezogene Schürfzüge
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Mașini grele > Screpere: Screpere cu ridicare; Screpere cu cupă deschisă; Screpere cu sistem de tragere
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Sunkioji technika > Skreperis: Pakeliamieji skreperiai; Skreperiai atvirais kaušais; Velkamieji skreperiai
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > เครื่องสำหรับอุตสาหกรรมหนัก > รถปรับถนน: รถปรับถนนแบบยก; รถปรับถนนแบบโอเพนโบวล์; รถปรับถนนแบบดึง
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Cơ khí nặng > Máy cạp đất: Máy nâng cạp đất; Máy cạp đất gầu mở; Máy kéo cạp đất
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Ağır İş Makineleri > Kazıyıcılar: Yükseltici Sıyırıcılar; Açık Kase Sıyırıcılar; Çekmeli Sıyırıcılar
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 重型机械 > 铲运机: 升降式铲运机; 开斗式铲运机; 推挽式铲运机
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Zwaar materieel > Scrapers: Ladderscrapers; Open bowl scrapers; Trekscrapers
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 重型機具 > 鏟運機: 升降式鏟運機; 鏟斗鏟運機; 拖式鏟運機
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Radni strojevi > Strugači: Strugači za podizanje; Strugači s otvorenom posudom; Strugači za povlačenje
en: Business & Industrial > Heavy Machinery > Scrapers: Elevating Scrapers; Open Bowl Scrapers; Pull Scrapers
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Тежка техника > Скрепери: Скрепери с повдигане; Скрепери с отворена кофа; Скрепери за дърпане
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Těžká stavební technika > Skrejpry (škrabače): Elevátorové skrejpry; Skrejpry s otevřenou korbou; Tažené skrejpry
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Nehézgépek > Kaparók: Emelő kaparók; Nyitott tálas kaparók; Húzókaparók
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Machinerie lourde > Décapeuses: Décapeuses élévatrices; Décapeuses à benne ouverte; Décapeuses à remorquer
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Maquinaria pesada > Raspadores: Raspadores de elevação; Raspadores de caixa aberta; Raspadores de tração
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Ciężki sprzęt > Zgarniarki: Zgarniarki z przenośnikiem; Zgarniarki z otwartą komorą; Zgarniarki ciągnione
it: Commercio e industria > Macchinari pesanti > Raschiatori: Raschiatori elevatori; Raschiatori a vaschetta aperta; Scraper a trazione
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 중공업 > 스크레이퍼: 엘리베이팅 스크레이퍼; 오픈 보울 스크레이퍼; 풀 스크레이퍼
sv: Företag och industri > Anläggningsmaskiner > Skrapor: Upphöjande skrapor; Öppna skålskrapor; Dragskrapor
es: Economía e industria > Maquinaria pesada > Traíllas: Traíllas elevadoras; Traíllas de caja abierta; Traíllas para viñedos y arbolados
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Maquinaria pesada > Raspadores: Raspadores com elevação; Raspadores de caçamba aberta; Raspadores de tração
nb: Forretninger og industri > Tunge maskiner > Skrapere: Løfteskrapere; Skrapere med åpen vogn; Trekkskrapere